District of Columbia statutes.
49-214

Armories to be provided.

The Quartermaster General of the militia shall provide, by rental or otherwise, such armories for the National Guard as may be allowed and directed by the Commanding General. He shall also provide each organization with such lockers, closets, gun racks, and cases or desks as may be necessary for the care, preservation, and safekeeping of the arms, equipments, uniforms, records, and other militia property in their possession. He shall also provide suitable rooms for the offices of the Commanding General and staff, for the keeping of books, the transaction of business, and the instruction of officers, and also suitable places for the storage and safekeeping of public property.

Mar. 1, 1889, 25 Stat. 777, ch. 328, § 39
renumbered Feb. 18, 1909, 35 Stat. 634, ch. 146, § 42

History

1981 Ed., § 39-214.
1973 Ed., § 39-514.

Prior Codifications